Oklahoma, session 2026, SB210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 405.6 of Title 10, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A child care facility that receives funding through the


Department of Human Services including, but not limited to, through


the child care subsidy program shall ensure that no print or


nonprint materials or multimedia resources located on the premises


of the facility contain any content related to sexual orientation or


gender identity.


B. A child care facility found by the Department to be in


violation of subsection A of this section after complaint and


investigation under Section 406 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes

Req. No. 142 Page 1


shall be ineligible for the child care subsidy program and any other


funding through the Department until such facility is determined to


be in compliance by the Department.


C. The Director of Human Services may promulgate rules as


necessary to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-142 DC 12/30/2024 4:03:23 PM

































Req. No. 142 Page 2